tortoisesvn/ext/spell/he_IL.aff
# This file was generated automatically from data prepared
# by the Hspell project (http://ivrix.org.il/projects/spell-checker).
# Hspell version 1.0 was used.
# The conversion was carried out in May 17 2006
# Copyright 2004-2006, Nadav Har'El and Dan Kenigsberg
# This dictionary (this file and the corresponding word list)
# is licensed under the GNU General Public License (GPL)
PFX a N 962
PFX a   0 ב [^ו]
PFX a   0 ב וו
PFX a   0 ב" .
PFX a   0 בו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 בכ [^ו]
PFX a   0 בכ וו
PFX a   0 בכ" .
PFX a   0 בכו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 ה [^ו]
PFX a   0 ה וו
PFX a   0 ה" .
PFX a   0 הו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 ו .
PFX a   0 ו" .
PFX a   0 וב [^ו]
PFX a   0 וב וו
PFX a   0 וב" .
PFX a   0 ובו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 ובכ [^ו]
PFX a   0 ובכ וו
PFX a   0 ובכ" .
PFX a   0 ובכו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 וה [^ו]
PFX a   0 וה וו
PFX a   0 וה" .
PFX a   0 והו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 וכ [^ו]
PFX a   0 וכ וו
PFX a   0 וכ" .
PFX a   0 וכו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 וכב [^ו]
PFX a   0 וכב וו
PFX a   0 וכב" .
PFX a   0 וכבו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 וככ [^ו]
PFX a   0 וככ וו
PFX a   0 וככ" .
PFX a   0 וככו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 וכל [^ו]
PFX a   0 וכל וו
PFX a   0 וכל" .
PFX a   0 וכלו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 וכמ [^ו]
PFX a   0 וכמ וו
PFX a   0 וכמ" .
PFX a   0 וכמו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 וכמה [^ו]
PFX a   0 וכמה וו
PFX a   0 וכמה" .
PFX a   0 וכמהו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 וכש [^ו]
PFX a   0 וכש וו
PFX a   0 וכש" .
PFX a   0 וכשו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 וכשב [^ו]
PFX a   0 וכשב וו
PFX a   0 וכשב" .
PFX a   0 וכשבו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 וכשבכ [^ו]
PFX a   0 וכשבכ וו
PFX a   0 וכשבכ" .
PFX a   0 וכשבכו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 וכשה [^ו]
PFX a   0 וכשה וו
PFX a   0 וכשה" .
PFX a   0 וכשהו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 וכשכ [^ו]
PFX a   0 וכשכ וו
PFX a   0 וכשכ" .
PFX a   0 וכשכו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 וכשכב [^ו]
PFX a   0 וכשכב וו
PFX a   0 וכשכב" .
PFX a   0 וכשכבו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 וכשככ [^ו]
PFX a   0 וכשככ וו
PFX a   0 וכשככ" .
PFX a   0 וכשככו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 וכשכל [^ו]
PFX a   0 וכשכל וו
PFX a   0 וכשכל" .
PFX a   0 וכשכלו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 וכשכמ [^ו]
PFX a   0 וכשכמ וו
PFX a   0 וכשכמ" .
PFX a   0 וכשכמו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 וכשכמה [^ו]
PFX a   0 וכשכמה וו
PFX a   0 וכשכמה" .
PFX a   0 וכשכמהו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 וכשל [^ו]
PFX a   0 וכשל וו
PFX a   0 וכשל" .
PFX a   0 וכשלו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 וכשלכ [^ו]
PFX a   0 וכשלכ וו
PFX a   0 וכשלכ" .
PFX a   0 וכשלכו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 וכשמ [^ו]
PFX a   0 וכשמ וו
PFX a   0 וכשמ" .
PFX a   0 וכשמו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 וכשמה [^ו]
PFX a   0 וכשמה וו
PFX a   0 וכשמה" .
PFX a   0 וכשמהו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 וכשמכ [^ו]
PFX a   0 וכשמכ וו
PFX a   0 וכשמכ" .
PFX a   0 וכשמכו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 ול [^ו]
PFX a   0 ול וו
PFX a   0 ול" .
PFX a   0 ולו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 ולכ [^ו]
PFX a   0 ולכ וו
PFX a   0 ולכ" .
PFX a   0 ולכו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 ולכש [^ו]
PFX a   0 ולכש וו
PFX a   0 ולכש" .
PFX a   0 ולכשו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 ולכשב [^ו]
PFX a   0 ולכשב וו
PFX a   0 ולכשב" .
PFX a   0 ולכשבו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 ולכשבכ [^ו]
PFX a   0 ולכשבכ וו
PFX a   0 ולכשבכ" .
PFX a   0 ולכשבכו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 ולכשה [^ו]
PFX a   0 ולכשה וו
PFX a   0 ולכשה" .
PFX a   0 ולכשהו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 ולכשכ [^ו]
PFX a   0 ולכשכ וו
PFX a   0 ולכשכ" .
PFX a   0 ולכשכו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 ולכשכב [^ו]
PFX a   0 ולכשכב וו
PFX a   0 ולכשכב" .
PFX a   0 ולכשכבו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 ולכשככ [^ו]
PFX a   0 ולכשככ וו
PFX a   0 ולכשככ" .
PFX a   0 ולכשככו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 ולכשכל [^ו]
PFX a   0 ולכשכל וו
PFX a   0 ולכשכל" .
PFX a   0 ולכשכלו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 ולכשכמ [^ו]
PFX a   0 ולכשכמ וו
PFX a   0 ולכשכמ" .
PFX a   0 ולכשכמו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 ולכשכמה [^ו]
PFX a   0 ולכשכמה וו
PFX a   0 ולכשכמה" .
PFX a   0 ולכשכמהו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 ולכשל [^ו]
PFX a   0 ולכשל וו
PFX a   0 ולכשל" .
PFX a   0 ולכשלו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 ולכשלכ [^ו]
PFX a   0 ולכשלכ וו
PFX a   0 ולכשלכ" .
PFX a   0 ולכשלכו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 ולכשמ [^ו]
PFX a   0 ולכשמ וו
PFX a   0 ולכשמ" .
PFX a   0 ולכשמו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 ולכשמה [^ו]
PFX a   0 ולכשמה וו
PFX a   0 ולכשמה" .
PFX a   0 ולכשמהו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 ולכשמכ [^ו]
PFX a   0 ולכשמכ וו
PFX a   0 ולכשמכ" .
PFX a   0 ולכשמכו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 ומ [^ו]
PFX a   0 ומ וו
PFX a   0 ומ" .
PFX a   0 ומו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 ומה [^ו]
PFX a   0 ומה וו
PFX a   0 ומה" .
PFX a   0 ומהו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 ומכ [^ו]
PFX a   0 ומכ וו
PFX a   0 ומכ" .
PFX a   0 ומכו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 ומש [^ו]
PFX a   0 ומש וו
PFX a   0 ומש" .
PFX a   0 ומשו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 ומשב [^ו]
PFX a   0 ומשב וו
PFX a   0 ומשב" .
PFX a   0 ומשבו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 ומשבכ [^ו]
PFX a   0 ומשבכ וו
PFX a   0 ומשבכ" .
PFX a   0 ומשבכו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 ומשה [^ו]
PFX a   0 ומשה וו
PFX a   0 ומשה" .
PFX a   0 ומשהו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 ומשכ [^ו]
PFX a   0 ומשכ וו
PFX a   0 ומשכ" .
PFX a   0 ומשכו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 ומשכב [^ו]
PFX a   0 ומשכב וו
PFX a   0 ומשכב" .
PFX a   0 ומשכבו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 ומשככ [^ו]
PFX a   0 ומשככ וו
PFX a   0 ומשככ" .
PFX a   0 ומשככו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 ומשכל [^ו]
PFX a   0 ומשכל וו
PFX a   0 ומשכל" .
PFX a   0 ומשכלו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 ומשכמ [^ו]
PFX a   0 ומשכמ וו
PFX a   0 ומשכמ" .
PFX a   0 ומשכמו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 ומשכמה [^ו]
PFX a   0 ומשכמה וו
PFX a   0 ומשכמה" .
PFX a   0 ומשכמהו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 ומשל [^ו]
PFX a   0 ומשל וו
PFX a   0 ומשל" .
PFX a   0 ומשלו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 ומשלכ [^ו]
PFX a   0 ומשלכ וו
PFX a   0 ומשלכ" .
PFX a   0 ומשלכו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 ומשמ [^ו]
PFX a   0 ומשמ וו
PFX a   0 ומשמ" .
PFX a   0 ומשמו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 ומשמה [^ו]
PFX a   0 ומשמה וו
PFX a   0 ומשמה" .
PFX a   0 ומשמהו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 ומשמכ [^ו]
PFX a   0 ומשמכ וו
PFX a   0 ומשמכ" .
PFX a   0 ומשמכו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 וש [^ו]
PFX a   0 וש וו
PFX a   0 וש" .
PFX a   0 ושו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 ושב [^ו]
PFX a   0 ושב וו
PFX a   0 ושב" .
PFX a   0 ושבו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 ושבכ [^ו]
PFX a   0 ושבכ וו
PFX a   0 ושבכ" .
PFX a   0 ושבכו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 ושה [^ו]
PFX a   0 ושה וו
PFX a   0 ושה" .
PFX a   0 ושהו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 ושכ [^ו]
PFX a   0 ושכ וו
PFX a   0 ושכ" .
PFX a   0 ושכו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 ושכב [^ו]
PFX a   0 ושכב וו
PFX a   0 ושכב" .
PFX a   0 ושכבו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 ושככ [^ו]
PFX a   0 ושככ וו
PFX a   0 ושככ" .
PFX a   0 ושככו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 ושכל [^ו]
PFX a   0 ושכל וו
PFX a   0 ושכל" .
PFX a   0 ושכלו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 ושכמ [^ו]
PFX a   0 ושכמ וו
PFX a   0 ושכמ" .
PFX a   0 ושכמו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 ושכמה [^ו]
PFX a   0 ושכמה וו
PFX a   0 ושכמה" .
PFX a   0 ושכמהו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 ושכש [^ו]
PFX a   0 ושכש וו
PFX a   0 ושכש" .
PFX a   0 ושכשו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 ושכשב [^ו]
PFX a   0 ושכשב וו
PFX a   0 ושכשב" .
PFX a   0 ושכשבו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 ושכשבכ [^ו]
PFX a   0 ושכשבכ וו
PFX a   0 ושכשבכ" .
PFX a   0 ושכשבכו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 ושכשה [^ו]
PFX a   0 ושכשה וו
PFX a   0 ושכשה" .
PFX a   0 ושכשהו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 ושכשכ [^ו]
PFX a   0 ושכשכ וו
PFX a   0 ושכשכ" .
PFX a   0 ושכשכו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 ושכשכב [^ו]
PFX a   0 ושכשכב וו
PFX a   0 ושכשכב" .
PFX a   0 ושכשכבו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 ושכשככ [^ו]
PFX a   0 ושכשככ וו
PFX a   0 ושכשככ" .
PFX a   0 ושכשככו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 ושכשכל [^ו]
PFX a   0 ושכשכל וו
PFX a   0 ושכשכל" .
PFX a   0 ושכשכלו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 ושכשכמ [^ו]
PFX a   0 ושכשכמ וו
PFX a   0 ושכשכמ" .
PFX a   0 ושכשכמו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 ושכשכמה [^ו]
PFX a   0 ושכשכמה וו
PFX a   0 ושכשכמה" .
PFX a   0 ושכשכמהו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 ושכשל [^ו]
PFX a   0 ושכשל וו
PFX a   0 ושכשל" .
PFX a   0 ושכשלו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 ושכשלכ [^ו]
PFX a   0 ושכשלכ וו
PFX a   0 ושכשלכ" .
PFX a   0 ושכשלכו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 ושכשמ [^ו]
PFX a   0 ושכשמ וו
PFX a   0 ושכשמ" .
PFX a   0 ושכשמו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 ושכשמה [^ו]
PFX a   0 ושכשמה וו
PFX a   0 ושכשמה" .
PFX a   0 ושכשמהו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 ושכשמכ [^ו]
PFX a   0 ושכשמכ וו
PFX a   0 ושכשמכ" .
PFX a   0 ושכשמכו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 ושל [^ו]
PFX a   0 ושל וו
PFX a   0 ושל" .
PFX a   0 ושלו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 ושלכ [^ו]
PFX a   0 ושלכ וו
PFX a   0 ושלכ" .
PFX a   0 ושלכו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 ושלכש [^ו]
PFX a   0 ושלכש וו
PFX a   0 ושלכש" .
PFX a   0 ושלכשו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 ושלכשב [^ו]
PFX a   0 ושלכשב וו
PFX a   0 ושלכשב" .
PFX a   0 ושלכשבו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 ושלכשבכ [^ו]
PFX a   0 ושלכשבכ וו
PFX a   0 ושלכשבכ" .
PFX a   0 ושלכשבכו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 ושלכשה [^ו]
PFX a   0 ושלכשה וו
PFX a   0 ושלכשה" .
PFX a   0 ושלכשהו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 ושלכשכ [^ו]
PFX a   0 ושלכשכ וו
PFX a   0 ושלכשכ" .
PFX a   0 ושלכשכו ו[^ו]
PFX a   0 ושלכשכב [^ו]
PFX a   0 ושלכשכב וו
PFX a   0 ושלכשכב" .
